Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2122.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. On and after January 1, 2026, K.S.A. 8-143 is hereby
amended to read as follows: 8-143. (a) All applications for the
registration of motorcycles, motorized bicycles and passenger vehicles
other than trucks and truck tractors, except as otherwise provided, shall
be accompanied by an annual license fee as follows:
(1) Prior to January 1, 2020:
(A) For motorized bicycles, $11;
(B) for motorcycles, $16;
(C) for passenger vehicles, other than motorcycles, used solely for
the carrying of persons for pleasure or business, and for hearses and
ambulances a fee of:
(i) For those having a gross weight of 4,500 pounds or less, $30;
and
(ii) for those having a gross weight of more than 4,500 pounds,
$40.
(D) Except for motor vehicles, trailers or semitrailers registered
under the provisions of K.S.A. 8-1,134, and amendments thereto, the
annual registration fee for each motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer
owned by any political or taxing subdivision of this state or by any
agency or instrumentality of any one or more political or taxing
subdivisions of this state and used exclusively for governmental
purposes and not for any private or utility purposes, that is not
otherwise exempt from registration, shall be $2.
(2) On and after January 1, 2020:
(A) For motorized bicycles, $11;
(B)(2) for motorcycles, $16;
(3) for those motorcycles that are all-electric motorcycles, $30;
(C)(4) for passenger vehicles, other than motorcycles, used solely
for the carrying of persons for pleasure or business, and for hearses and
ambulances a fee of:
(i)(A) For those having a gross weight of 4,500 pounds or less,
$30;
(ii)(B) for those having a gross weight of more than 4,500 pounds,
$40;
(iii)(C) for those motor vehicles that are electric hybrid vehicles,
$70;
(D) for those motor vehicles that are electric hybrid or plug-in
electric hybrid vehicles, $50 $100; and
(iv)(E) for those motor vehicles that are all-electric vehicles, $100.
$165; and
(D)(5) except for motor vehicles, trailers or semitrailers registered
under the provisions of K.S.A. 8-1,134, and amendments thereto, the
annual registration fee for each motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer
owned by any political or taxing subdivision of this state or by any
agency or instrumentality of any one or more political or taxing
subdivisions of this state and used exclusively for governmental
purposes and not for any private or utility purposes, that is not
otherwise exempt from registration, shall be $2.
(b) (1) As used in this subsection, the term "gross weight" shall
mean and include the empty weight of the truck, or combination of the
truck or truck tractor and any type trailer or semitrailer, plus the
maximum weight of cargo which will be transported on or with the
same, except when the empty weight of a truck plus the maximum
weight of cargo which will be transported thereon is 12,000 pounds or
less. The term gross weight shall not include: The weight of any travel

HOUSE BILL No. 2122—page 2
trailer propelled thereby which is being used for private recreational
purposes; or the weight of any vehicle or combination of vehicles for
which wrecker or towing service, as defined in K.S.A. 66-1329, and
amendments thereto, is to be provided by a wrecker or tow truck, as
defined in K.S.A. 66-1329, and amendments thereto. Such wrecker or
tow truck shall be registered for the empty weight of such vehicle fully
equipped for the recovery or towing of vehicles. The gross weight
license fees hereinafter prescribed shall only apply to the truck or truck
tractor used as the propelling unit for the cargo and vehicle propelled,
either as a single vehicle or combination of vehicles. On application for
the registration of a truck or truck tractor, the owner thereof shall
declare as a part of such application the maximum gross weight the
owner desires to be applicable to such vehicle, which declared gross
weight in no event shall be in excess of the limitations described by
K.S.A. 8-1908 and 8-1909, and amendments thereto, for such vehicle
or combination of vehicles of which it will be a part. All applications
for the registration of trucks or truck tractors, except as otherwise
provided herein, shall be accompanied by an annual license fee as
follows:
For a gross weight of 12,000 lbs. or less unless otherwise provided .$40
For a gross weight of 12,000 lbs or less and the truck
or truck tractor is an electric hybrid or plug-in electric hybrid ...125
For a gross weight of 12,000 lbs or less and the truck
or truck tractor is all-electric .......................................................200
For a gross weight of more than 12,000 lbs. and not
more than 16,000 lbs. ....................................................................202
For a gross weight of more than 16,000 lbs. and not
more than 20,000 lbs. ....................................................................232
For a gross weight of more than 20,000 lbs. and not
more than 24,000 lbs. ....................................................................297
For a gross weight of more than 24,000 lbs. and not
more than 26,000 lbs. ....................................................................412
For a gross weight of more than 26,000 lbs. and not
more than 30,000 lbs. ....................................................................412
For a gross weight of more than 30,000 lbs. and not
more than 36,000 lbs. ....................................................................475
For a gross weight of more than 36,000 lbs. and not
more than 42,000 lbs. ....................................................................575
For a gross weight of more than 42,000 lbs. and not
more than 48,000 lbs. ....................................................................705
For a gross weight of more than 48,000 lbs. and not
more than 54,000 lbs. ....................................................................905
For a gross weight of more than 54,000 lbs. and not
more than 60,000 lbs. .................................................................1,145
For a gross weight of more than 60,000 lbs. and not
more than 66,000 lbs. .................................................................1,345
For a gross weight of more than 66,000 lbs. and not
more than 74,000 lbs. .................................................................1,670
For a gross weight of more than 74,000 lbs. and not
more than 80,000 lbs. .................................................................1,870
For a gross weight of more than 80,000 lbs. and not
more than 85,500 lbs. .................................................................2,070
(2) If the applicant for registration of any truck or truck tractor for
a gross weight of more than 12,000 pounds in the state of Kansas or
any political or taxing subdivision or agency of the state, except a city
or county, whose truck or truck tractor is not otherwise entitled to the
$2 license fee or otherwise exempt from all fees, such vehicle may be
licensed for a fee in accordance with the schedule hereinafter
prescribed for local trucks or truck tractors.
(3) If the applicant for registration of any truck or truck tractor for
a gross weight of more than 12,000 pounds shall under oath state in
writing on a form prescribed and furnished by the director of vehicles
that the applicant does not expect to operate it more than 6,000 miles in
the calendar year for which the applicant seeks registration, and that if

HOUSE BILL No. 2122—page 3
the applicant shall operate it more than 6,000 miles during such
registration year such applicant will pay an additional fee equal to the
fee required by the schedule under paragraph (1), less the amount of the
fee paid at time of registration, such vehicle may be licensed for a fee
in accordance with the schedule prescribed for local trucks or truck
tractors. Whenever a truck or truck tractor is registered on a local truck
or truck tractor fee basis a tab or marker shall be issued in connection
with the regular license plate, which tab or marker shall be attached or
affixed to and displayed with the regular license plate and the failure to
have the same attached, affixed or displayed shall be subject to the
same penalties as provided by law for the failure to display the regular
license plate; and the secretary of revenue may adopt rules and
regulations requiring the owners of trucks and truck tractors so
registered on a local truck or truck tractor fee basis to keep such records
and make such reports of mileage of such vehicles as the secretary of
revenue shall deem proper.
(4) A transporter delivering vehicles not the transporter's own by
the driveaway method where such vehicles are being driven, towed, or
transported singly, or by the saddlemount, towbar, or fullmount
methods, or by any lawful combination thereof, may apply for license
plates which may be transferred from one such vehicle or combination
to another for each delivery without further registration, and the annual
license fee for such license plate shall be as follows:
For the first such set of license plates ................................................$64
For each additional such set of license plates ......................................38
(5) A truck or truck tractor registered for a gross weight of more
than 12,000 pounds that is operated wholly within the corporate limits
of a city or village or within a radius of 25 miles beyond the corporate
limits, shall be classified as a local truck except that in no event shall
such vehicles operated as contract or common carriers outside a radius
of three miles beyond the corporate limits of the city or village in which
such vehicles were based when registered and licensed be considered
local trucks or truck tractors. The secretary of revenue is hereby
authorized and directed to adopt rules and regulations prescribing a
procedure for the issuance of permits by the division of vehicles
whereby owners of local trucks or truck tractors may operate any such
vehicle, empty, beyond the radius hereinbefore prescribed, when such
operation is solely for the purpose of having such vehicle repaired,
painted or serviced or for adding additional equipment thereto. The
annual license fee for a local truck or truck tractor, except as otherwise
provided herein, shall be as follows:
For a gross weight of more than 12,000 lbs. and not
more than 16,000 lbs. ..................................................................$162
For a gross weight of more than 16,000 lbs. and not
more than 20,000 lbs. ....................................................................202
For a gross weight of more than 20,000 lbs. and not
more than 24,000 lbs. ....................................................................232
For a gross weight of more than 24,000 lbs. and not
more than 26,000 lbs. ....................................................................277
For a gross weight of more than 26,000 lbs. and not
more than 30,000 lbs. ....................................................................277
For a gross weight of more than 30,000 lbs. and not
more than 36,000 lbs. ....................................................................315
For a gross weight of more than 36,000 lbs. and not
more than 42,000 lbs. ....................................................................345
For a gross weight of more than 42,000 lbs. and not
more than 48,000 lbs. ....................................................................415
For a gross weight of more than 48,000 lbs. and not
more than 54,000 lbs. ....................................................................515
For a gross weight of more than 54,000 lbs. and not
more than 60,000 lbs. ....................................................................615
For a gross weight of more than 60,000 lbs. and not
more than 66,000 lbs. ....................................................................715
For a gross weight of more than 66,000 lbs. and not

HOUSE BILL No. 2122—page 4
more than 74,000 lbs. ....................................................................895
For a gross weight of more than 74,000 lbs. and not
more than 80,000 lbs. .................................................................1,025
For a gross weight of more than 80,000 lbs. and not
more than 85,500 lbs. .................................................................1,145
(6) A truck or truck tractor registered for a gross weight of more
than 12,000 pounds, which is owned by a person engaged in farming
and which truck or truck tractor is used by such owner to transport
agricultural products produced by such owner or commodities
purchased by such owner for use on the farm owned or rented by the
owner of such farm truck or truck tractor, shall be classified as a farm
truck or truck tractor and the annual license fee for such farm truck
shall be as follows:
For a gross weight of more than 12,000 lbs. and not
more than 16,000 lbs. ....................................................................$57
For a gross weight of more than 16,000 lbs. and not
more than 20,000 lbs. ....................................................................142
For a gross weight of more than 20,000 lbs. and not
more than 24,000 lbs. ....................................................................152
For a gross weight of more than 24,000 lbs. and not
more than 26,000 lbs. ....................................................................172
For a gross weight of more than 26,000 lbs. and not
more than 36,000 lbs. ....................................................................172
For a gross weight of more than 36,000 lbs. and not
more than 54,000 lbs. ....................................................................175
For a gross weight of more than 54,000 lbs. and not
more than 60,000 lbs. ....................................................................325
For a gross weight of more than 60,000 lbs. and not
more than 66,000 lbs. ....................................................................505
For a gross weight of more than 66,000 lbs. ......................................745
A vehicle licensed as a farm truck or truck tractor may be used by
the owner thereof to transport, for charity and without compensation of
any kind, commodities for religious or educational institutions. A truck
that is licensed as a farm truck may also be used for the transportation
of sand, gravel, slag stone, limestone, crushed stone, cinders, black top,
dirt or fill material to a township road maintenance or construction site
of the township in which the owner of such truck resides. Any applicant
for registration of any farm truck or farm truck tractor used in
combination with a trailer or semitrailer shall register the farm truck or
farm truck tractor for a gross weight which shall include the empty
weight of the truck or truck tractor or of the combination of any truck
or truck tractor and any type of trailer or semitrailer, plus the maximum
weight of cargo that will be transported on or with the same. The
applicant for registration of any farm truck or farm truck tractor used to
transport a gross weight of more than 54,000 pounds shall durably
letter on the side of the motor vehicle the words "farm vehicle—not for
hire." If an applicant for registration of any farm truck or farm truck
tractor operates such vehicle for any use or purpose not authorized for a
farm truck or farm truck tractor, such applicant shall pay an additional
fee equal to the fee required for the registration of all trucks or truck
tractors not registered as local, 6,000-mile or farm truck or farm truck
tractor motor vehicles, less the amount of the fee paid at time of
registration. Nothing in this or the preceding paragraph shall authorize
a gross weight of a vehicle or combination of vehicles on the national
system of interstate and defense highways greater than permitted by
laws of the United States congress.
(7) Except as provided herein, the annual license fee for each local
urban transit bus used in local urban transit operations exempted under
the provisions of K.S.A. 66-1,109(a), and amendments thereto, shall be
based on the passenger seating capacity of the bus and shall be as
follows:
8 or more, but less than 31 passengers ...............................................$35
31 or more, but less than 40 passengers ...............................................50
More than 39 passengers ......................................................................80

HOUSE BILL No. 2122—page 5
The annual license fee for each local urban transit bus that is owned
by a metropolitan transit authority established pursuant to articles 25
and 28 of chapter 12 or pursuant to article 31 of chapter 13 of the
Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto, shall be $2.
(8) For licensing purposes, station wagons with a carrying
capacity of less than 10 passengers shall be subject to registration fees
based on the weight of the vehicles, as provided in subsection (a).
Station wagons with a carrying capacity of 10 or more passengers shall
be subject to the truck classifications and license fees as provided.
(9) For any trailer, semitrailer, travel trailer or pole trailer the
annual license fee shall be as follows:
(A) For any such vehicle with a gross weight of more than 12,000
pounds but less than 54,000 pounds the annual fee shall be $55;
(B) any such vehicle grossing more than 8,000 pounds but not
over 12,000 pounds, the annual fee shall be $45; and
(C) for any such vehicle grossing more than 2,000 pounds but not
over 8,000 pounds, the annual fee shall be $35.
Any such vehicle having a gross weight of 2,000 pounds or less
may, at the owner's option, be registered and the fee for such
registration shall be as provided in paragraph (C).
Any trailer, semitrailer or travel trailer owned by a nonresident of
this state and based in another state that is properly registered and
licensed in the state of residence of the owner or in the state where
based, may be operated in this state without being registered or licensed
in this state if the truck or truck tractor propelling the same is properly
registered and licensed in this state, or is registered and licensed in
some other state and is entitled to reciprocal privileges of operation in
this state, but this provision shall not apply to any trailer or semitrailer
owned by a nonresident of this state when such trailer or semitrailer is
owned by a person who has proportionately registered and licensed a
fleet of vehicles under the provisions of K.S.A. 8-1,101 through 8-
1,123, and amendments thereto, or under the terms of any reciprocal or
proration agreement made pursuant thereto.
At the option of the owner, any trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer,
with a gross weight of more than 12,000 pounds, may be issued a
multi-year registration for a five-year period upon payment of the
appropriate registration fee. The fee for a five-year registration of such
trailer shall be five times the annual fee for such trailer. If the annual
registration fee is increased during the multi-year registration period,
the owner of the trailer with such multi-year registration shall be
subject to the amount of the increase of the annual registration fee for
the remaining calendar years of such multi-year registration. When the
owner of any trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer registered under this
multi-year provision transfers or assigns the title, or interest thereto, the
registration of such trailer shall expire. The owner shall remove the
license plate from such trailer and forward the license plate to the
division of vehicles or may have such license plate assigned to another
trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer upon the payment of fees required by
law. Any owner of a trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer where the multi-
year registration fee has been paid and the trailer is sold, junked,
repossessed, foreclosed by a mechanic's lien or title transferred by
operation of law, and the registration thereon is not going to be
transferred to another trailer, may secure a refund for the registration
fee for the remaining calendar years by making application to the
division of vehicles on a form and in the manner prescribed by the
director of vehicles. The secretary of revenue may adopt such rules and
regulations necessary to implement the multi-year registration of such
trailers, semitrailers and pole trailers.
(c) Any truck or truck tractor having a gross weight of 4,000
pounds or over, using solid tires, shall pay a license fee of double the
amount herein charged. The annual fees herein provided for trucks,
truck tractors and trailers not subject to K.S.A. 8-134a, and
amendments thereto, shall be due January 1 of each year and payable
on or before the last day of February in each year. If the fee is not paid

HOUSE BILL No. 2122—page 6
by such date a penalty of $1 shall be added to the fee charged herein for
each month or fraction thereof and until December 31 of each
registration year. The annual registration fee for all passenger vehicles
and vehicles subject to K.S.A. 8-134a, and amendments thereto, shall
be due on or before the last day of the month in which the registration
plate expires and shall be due for other vehicles as provided by K.S.A.
8-134, and amendments thereto. If the registration fee is not paid by
such date a penalty of $1 shall be added to the fee charged herein for
each month or fraction thereof until such registration fee is paid.
Members of the armed forces of the United States shall be permitted to
apply for registration at any time and be subject to registration fee, less
penalties, applicable at the time the application is made. If any
motorcycle, motorized bicycle, trailer, semitrailer, travel trailer, or pole
trailer is either purchased or acquired after the anniversary or renewal
date in any registration year there shall immediately become due and
payable a registration fee as follows: If purchased or acquired between
the anniversary or renewal date of any registration year and the first six
months of such registration year, the annual fee provided herein; if
purchased or acquired during the last six months of any registration
year, 50% of such annual fee. If any truck or truck tractor, except trucks
subject to K.S.A. 8-134a, and amendments thereto, is purchased or
acquired prior to April 1 of any year the fee shall be the annual fee
provided herein, but if such truck or truck tractor is purchased or
acquired after the end of March of any year, the license fee for such
year shall be reduced 1/ for each calendar month which has elapsed
12
since the beginning of the year. If any truck registered for a gross
weight of 12,000 pounds or less or passenger vehicle is purchased or
acquired and less than 12 months remain in the registration period, the
fee shall be 1/ of the annual fee for each calendar month remaining in
12
the registration period.
(d) The owner of any motorcycle, motorized bicycle, passenger
vehicle, truck, truck tractor, trailer, semitrailer, or electrically propelled
vehicle who fails to pay the registration fee or fees herein provided on
the date when the same become due and payable shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be subject to a penalty
in the sum of $1 for each month or fraction thereof during which such
fee has remained unpaid after it became due and payable; and in
addition thereto shall be subject to such other punishment as is
provided in this act. Upon the transfer of motorcycles, motorized
bicycles, passenger vehicles, trailers, semitrailers, trucks or truck
tractors, on which registration fees have been paid for the year in which
the transfer is made, either: (1) To a corporation by one or more
persons, solely in exchange for stock or securities in such corporation;
or (2) by one corporation to another corporation when all of the assets
of such corporation are transferred to the other corporation, then in
either case, paragraph (1) or (2) the corporation shall be exempt from
the payment of registration fees on such vehicles for the year in which
such transfer is made. Applications for transfer or registration shall be
accompanied by a fee of $1.50. When the registration of a vehicle has
expired at midnight on the last day of any registration year, and such
vehicle is not thereafter operated upon the highways, any application
for renewal of registration made subsequent to the anniversary or
renewal date of any registration year following the expiration of such
registration and for succeeding registration years in which such vehicle
has not been registered shall be accompanied by an affidavit of
nonoperation and nonuse, and such application for renewal or
registration shall be received by the division of vehicles upon payment
of the proper fees for the current registration year and without penalty.
(e) Any nonresident of Kansas purchasing a vehicle from a Kansas
resident and desiring to secure registration on the vehicle in the state of
such person's residence may make application in the office of any
county treasurer for a sixty-day temporary registration. The county
treasurer upon presentation of evidence of ownership in the applicant
and evidence the sales tax has been paid, if due, shall charge and collect

HOUSE BILL No. 2122—page 7
a fee of $3 for each sixty-day temporary license and issue a sticker or
paper registration as may be determined by the director of vehicles, and
the registration so issued shall be valid for a period of 60 days from the
date of issuance.
(f) Any owner of any motor vehicle that is subject to taxation
under the provisions of article 51 of chapter 79 of the Kansas Statutes
Annotated, and amendments thereto, or any other truck or truck tractor
where the annual registration fee has been paid and the vehicle is sold,
junked, repossessed, foreclosed by a mechanic's lien or title transferred
by operation of law, and the registration thereon is not going to be
transferred to another vehicle may secure a refund for the registration
fee for the remaining portion of the year by making application to the
division of vehicles on a form and in the manner prescribed by the
director of vehicles, accompanied by all license plates and attachments
issued in connection therewith. If the owner of the registration becomes
deceased and the vehicle is not going to be used on the highway, and
title is not being currently transferred, the proper representative of the
estate shall be entitled to the refund. The refund shall be made only for
the period of time remaining in the registration year from the date of
completion and filing of the application with and delivery of the license
plate and attachments to the division of vehicles. Where the registration
is secured under a quarterly payment annual registration fee, as
provided for in K.S.A. 8-143a, and amendments thereto, such refund
shall be made on the quarterly fee paid and unused and all remaining
quarterly payments shall be canceled. Any truck or truck tractor having
the registration fee paid on quarterly payment basis, all quarterly
payments due or a fraction of quarterly payment due shall be paid
before title may be transferred, except that in case of death, the filing of
the application and returning of the license plate and attachment shall
cancel the remaining annual payments due. Whenever a truck or truck
tractor, where the registration is secured on a quarterly payment of the
annual registration, the one repossessing the truck or truck tractor, or
foreclosing by a mechanic's lien, or securing title by court order, the
mortgagor or the assigns of the mortgagor, or the one securing title may
pay the balance due on date of application for title, but the payments
for the remaining portion of the year shall not be canceled unless
application is made and the license plate and attachments are
surrendered. Nothing in this subsection shall apply when registration is
secured under the provisions of K.S.A. 8-1,101 through 8-1,123, and
amendments thereto. Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions
of this section, no refund shall be made under the provisions of this
section where the amount thereof does not exceed $5. The division of
vehicles shall furnish such blank forms as may be required under the
provisions of this subsection as it deems necessary to be completed by
the applicant. Whenever a registration which has been secured on a
quarterly basis shall be canceled as provided in this subsection, the
division of vehicles shall notify the county treasurer issuing the original
registration of such cancellation so that the county treasurer may, and
the county treasurer shall cancel the registration of such vehicle in the
county treasurer's office and release any lien issued in connection with
such registration.
(g) Every owner of a travel trailer designed for or intended to be
moved upon any highway in this state shall, before the same is so
moved, apply for and obtain the proper registration thereof as provided
in this act, except when such unit is permitted to be moved under the
special provisions relating to secured parties, manufacturers, dealers
and nonresidents contained in this act. At the time of registering any
travel trailer for the purpose of moving any such vehicle upon any
highway in this state, the owner thereof shall indicate on the
registration form whether or not such vehicle is being moved
permanently to a location outside of the county in which such vehicle is
being registered. No such vehicle which the owner thereof intends to
move to a permanent location outside the boundaries of such county
shall be registered for movement on the highways of this state until all

HOUSE BILL No. 2122—page 8
taxes levied against such vehicle have been paid. A copy of such
registration form shall be sent to the county clerk or assessor of the
county to which such vehicle is being moved. When such travel trailer
is used for living quarters and not operated on the highways, the owner
shall be exempt from the license fees as provided in subsection (b)(9)
so long as such travel trailer is not operated on the highway.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 8-143a is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
143a. (a) The provisions of this section shall not apply to vehicles
registered on an apportioned basis as part of a fleet under the provisions
of K.S.A. 8-1,101 to through 8-1,123, inclusive, and amendments
thereto, or any agreement made by the director of vehicles, and. The
payment of registration fees on a quarterly basis on such vehicles shall
be in accordance with K.S.A. 8-1,115, and amendments thereto.
(b) A resident owner of any truck or truck tractor, holding a
negotiable Kansas title, whether individual, partnership or Kansas
corporation, may at such owner's election, made at the time the annual
registration fee on such truck or truck tractor is payable, pay such
annual registration fee if it such fee exceeds $100 $300, in equal
quarterly installments,. The first of which such quarterly payments
shall be payable at the time of such application but not later than the
last day of February in each year, and for each ensuing quarter
thereafter shall be payable respectively on the first day of April, July
and October. The applicant shall, at the time of registration, present
such applicant's negotiable Kansas title to the county treasurer, who
shall send it, along with the application for registration, to the division
of vehicles. The division of vehicles shall retain the title until all
quarterly payments are paid in full, at which time the title shall be
returned to the owner of the vehicle to which the title was issued.
(c) The provisions of the preceding paragraph subsection (b) shall
not in any manner be construed to affect or reduce the amount of
annual registration fee due for any truck or truck tractor subject to
registration on January 1, and for which the owner shall be liable, but
relate only to an alternate method of payment of the amount of fees due
and affixed as of January 1 of each year. If any owner shall default in
the payment of any quarterly installment payment when the same is
payable, the right to operate such vehicle on the highways of this state
shall terminate and it shall be unlawful to operate such vehicle on the
highways of this state until the delinquent quarterly installment
payment plus any penalty, shall have been paid in full.
(d) (1) If any owner shall fail to pay any two quarterly payment
installments during any one registration year on any truck or truck
tractor registered hereunder, on or before the day the same are due and
payable, such owner thereafter may be denied the privilege of the
payment of annual registration fees on a quarterly basis on any vehicle.
If a quarterly installment payment shall be delinquent more than 10
days beyond the due date of such quarterly installment, except for any
case where it is determined by the director of vehicles that such
delinquency is not due to negligence or intentional disregard of the
provisions of this section, then the entire balance of the annual
registration fee, including the delinquent quarterly installment, plus a
penalty in a sum equal to 10% of the annual registration fee, shall
become due and payable; and. Any such owner so delinquent may
thereafter be denied the privilege of the payment of annual registration
fees on any vehicle on a quarterly basis. All such fees and penalties
remaining unpaid shall constitute a debt due the state, which may be
collected from the person owing the same such unpaid fees and
penalties by suit or otherwise. All such fees and any penalties
remaining unpaid after the same such fees and any penalties are due
and payable and any penalties shall constitute a first and prior lien in
favor of the state upon the truck or truck tractor registered hereunder
under this section, and all other real and personal property of the owner
located within the state in the amount such fees and penalties remain
unpaid. Each lien shall attach at the time such unpaid fees and penalties
accrue and shall be paramount to all prior liens or encumbrances of any

HOUSE BILL No. 2122—page 9
character and to the rights of any holder of the legal title in or to any
such truck or truck tractor.
(2) When a quarterly installment is delinquent more than 10 days
beyond the due date, upon default of such installment payment, the
county treasurer shall promptly file a notice of lien in the office of the
register of deeds of the county where the registration fee is payable, and
in any other county in which such owner has any property. A copy of
such notice of lien shall be mailed to the division of vehicles, and the
owner so delinquent, and the sheriff of any county in which such notice
of lien is filed. Such notice of lien shall set forth the name and address
of the owner, the amount of fees and penalties payable and unpaid, and
the description of the vehicle or vehicles to which applicable to such
notice of lien. It shall be the duty of each register of deeds in this state
to index and file immediately all such notices of lien in the manner
provided in cases of financing statements and no fee shall be charged
for filing and indexing.
(3) The county treasurer shall issue a release of lien upon payment
of all fees and penalties payable by such owner and such person may
file the same with the register of deeds of any county in which such
notice of lien has been filed. The county treasurer shall mail a copy of
the release of lien to the division, and to the sheriff of any county where
said such notice of lien has been filed.
(4) If a quarterly installment payment shall be delinquent more
than 10 days beyond the due date of such quarterly installment, the
division, shall promptly on such default and the filing of the notice of
lien issue a tax warrant to the sheriff of any county in which such
notice of lien has been filed and may thereafter issue further warrants
as may be necessary, and. Such sheriff shall seize and hold all personal
property subject thereto to such lien and proceed to advertise and sell
the same such property or so much thereof as may be necessary, to
satisfy the state's lien, together with all expense of selling at public sale
for cash, upon such notice as is provided by law in the case of a
security agreement sale.
(5) Any surplus of the proceeds of such sale, after paying to the
county treasurer, the amount of the state's lien, and the cost of the
officer in giving notice of and executing said such warrant computed to
the same extent as in judicial sales on execution, and of securing and
preserving the property pending such sale, shall be delivered to the
person lawfully entitled thereto to such surplus amount. In the event
that any truck or truck tractor for which the annual registration fee is
being paid quarterly shall be sold or otherwise disposed of, the entire
balance remaining unpaid on such annual registration fee shall become
immediately due and payable.
(6) No certificate of title shall be assigned or transferred or new
certificate of title be issued for such vehicle until all the registration
fees and penalties are paid in full. In the event such vehicle shall be
repossessed by the enforcement of a lien or security interest on the
same such vehicle, during any quarterly period for which the
registration fees have not been paid, the person repossessing such
vehicle or the person purchasing such vehicle at a repossession sale,
may acquire a new certificate of title upon the payment of a fee equal to
1/ of the annual registration fee of the vehicle registered hereunder
4
under this section, plus the regular fee prescribed by law for certificate
of title. If any truck or truck tractor which that is registered under the
provisions of this subsection section is exchanged or traded by the
owner thereof for another truck or truck tractor, any registration fee and
any quarterly installments which that have been paid shall be applied to
the registration fee due for the registration of the newly acquired
vehicle. The application of any such registration fee or quarterly
installment to the newly acquired vehicle shall not affect or reduce the
original amount of the annual registration fee or any quarterly
installment payment, for which such owner was originally liable.
(e) The division of vehicles may call to its aid the state highway
patrol or any peace officer or any duly appointed representative of the

HOUSE BILL No. 2122—page 10
department to enforce the provisions of this section within their
respective jurisdiction and it shall be the duty of such officers to do so.
The remedies for enforcement and collection provided in this section
are cumulative and the use of one shall not be deemed to be a waiver of
the right to use any other.
Sec. 3. On and after January 1, 2026, K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 8-145 is
hereby amended to read as follows: 8-145. (a) All registration and
certificates of title fees shall be paid to the division of vehicles, a
contractor of the division or the county treasurer of the county in which
the applicant for registration resides or has an office or principal place
of business within this state. The division, contractor or the county
treasurer shall issue a receipt to the applicant for such fees paid.
(b) The county treasurer, division or contractor shall deposit $.75
out of each license application, $.75 out of each application for transfer
of license plate and $2 out of each application for a certificate of title,
collected under this act, in a special fund, which fund is hereby
appropriated for the use of the county treasurer, division or contractor
in paying for necessary help and expenses incidental to the
administration of duties in accordance with the provisions of this law.
The county treasurer shall receive extra compensation for the services
performed in administering the provisions of this act, which
compensation shall be in addition to any other compensation provided
by any other law, except that the county treasurer shall receive as
additional compensation for administering the motor vehicle title and
registration laws and fees, a sum computed as follows: The county
treasurer, during the month of December, shall determine the amount to
be retained for extra compensation not to exceed the following amounts
each year for calendar year 2006 or any calendar year thereafter: The
sum of $110 per hundred registrations for the first 5,000 registrations;
the sum of $90 per hundred registrations for the second 5,000
registrations; the sum of $5 per hundred for the third 5,000
registrations; and the sum of $2 per hundred registrations for all
registrations thereafter. In no event, however, shall any county treasurer
be entitled to receive more than $15,000 additional annual
compensation.
If more than one person shall hold the office of county treasurer
during any one calendar year, such compensation shall be prorated
among such persons in proportion to the number of weeks served. The
total amount of compensation paid the treasurer together with the
amounts expended in paying for other necessary help and expenses
incidental to the administration of the duties of the county treasurer in
accordance with the provisions of this act, shall not exceed the amount
deposited in such special fund. Any balance remaining in such fund at
the close of any calendar year shall be withdrawn and credited to the
general fund of the county prior to June 1 of the following calendar
year.
(c) The county treasurer, division or contractor shall remit the
remainder of all such fees collected, together with the original copy of
all applications, to the secretary of revenue. The secretary of revenue
shall remit all such fees remitted to the state treasurer in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon
receipt of each such remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the
entire amount in the state treasury to the credit of the state highway
fund, except as provided in subsection (d).
(d) (1) Three dollars and fifty cents of each certificate of title fee
collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to
the state treasurer who shall credit such $3.50 to the Kansas highway
patrol motor vehicle fund. Three dollars of each certificate of title fee
collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to
the state treasurer who shall credit such $3 to the VIPS/CAMA
technology hardware fund.
(2) For repossessed vehicles, $3 of each certificate of title fee
collected shall be retained by the contractor or county treasurer who
processed the application.

HOUSE BILL No. 2122—page 11
(3) Three dollars and fifty cents of each reassignment form fee
collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to
the state treasurer who shall credit such $3.50 to the Kansas highway
patrol motor vehicle fund. Three dollars of each reassignment form fee
collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to
the state treasurer who shall credit such $3 to the VIPS/CAMA
technology hardware fund.
(4) Four dollars of each division of vehicles modernization
surcharge collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be
remitted to the state treasurer who shall credit such $4 to the state
highway fund.
(5) Two dollars of each Kansas highway patrol staffing and
training surcharge collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue,
shall be remitted to the state treasurer who shall credit such $2 to the
Kansas highway patrol staffing and training fund.
(6) One dollar and twenty-five cents of each surcharge collected
and remitted to the secretary of revenue pursuant to K.S.A. 8-1,177,
and amendments thereto, shall be remitted to the state treasurer who
shall credit such $1.25 to the state general fund.
(7) Fees collected in K.S.A. 8-135 and 8-145, and amendments
thereto, that are collected by the division for commercial motor
vehicles or vehicles that are part of a commercial fleet, shall be
remitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit such amounts to the
commercial vehicle administrative fund.
(8) Fees collected in K.S.A. 8-135 and 8-145, and amendments
thereto, that are collected by the division for vehicles that are part of a
fleet rental pursuant to K.S.A. 8-1,189, and amendments thereto, shall
be remitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit such amounts to the
fleet rental vehicle administration fund.
(9) Fees collected in K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, for
those motorcycles that are all-electric motorcycles pursuant to K.S.A.
8-143(a)(3), and amendments thereto, for those motor vehicles that are
electric hybrid vehicles pursuant to K.S.A. 8-143(a)(4)(C), and
amendments thereto, for those motor vehicles that are plug-in electric
hybrid vehicles pursuant to K.S.A. 8-143(a)(4)(D), and amendments
thereto, for those motor vehicles that are all-electric vehicles pursuant
to K.S.A. 8-143(a)(4)(E), and amendments thereto, and for those truck
or truck tractors that are all-electric, an electric hybrid or a plug-in
electric hybrid with a gross weight of 12,000 pounds or less pursuant
to K.S.A. 8-143(b)(1), and amendments thereto, shall be remitted to the
state treasurer who shall credit to the state highway fund amounts
specified in K.S.A. 79-34,142, and amendments thereto, and amounts
specified in K.S.A. 79-34,142, and amendments thereto, to the special
city and county highway fund to be apportioned and distributed in the
manner provided in K.S.A. 79-3425c, and amendments thereto.

HOUSE BILL No. 2122—page 12
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 8-143a is hereby repealed.
Sec. 5. On and after January 1, 2026, K.S.A. 8-143 and K.S.A.
2024 Supp. 8-145 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 6. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and was
adopted by that body
HOUSE adopted
Conference Committee Report
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
SENATE adopted
Conference Committee Report
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
Governor.